Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2633
Registration for special local need; procedure.

(1) The department may register a pesticide for additional uses and methods of application not covered by federal regulation but not inconsistent with federal law for the purpose of meeting a special local need.

(2) Before approving a registration under this section, the department shall determine that the applicant meets the other requirements of the Pesticide Act and that a special local need exists.

(3) The department shall notify the federal agency of the issuance of any special local need registration. If the federal agency disapproves of any special local need registration within ninety days after issuance, such registration shall not be effective longer than such time.

Laws 1993, LB 588, § 12.